South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4537.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-101-620 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-101-620.  (A) A public institution of higher learning may offer educational fee waivers to no more than four percent of the undergraduate student body. (B) The provision of subsection (A) notwithstanding, institutions of higher learning may offer up to, but may not exceed, an additional four percent of educational fee waivers provided that additional waivers, if any, are limited exclusively to the benefit of undergraduate South Carolina in-state students. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----